Washington statutes.
RCW 7.77.030

Collaborative law participation agreement—Requirements.

(1) A collaborative law participation agreement must:

(a) Be in a record;

(b) Be signed by the parties;

(c) State the parties' intention to resolve a collaborative matter through a collaborative law process under this chapter;

(d) Describe the nature and scope of the matter;

(e) Identify the collaborative lawyer who represents each party in the process; and

(f) Contain a statement by each collaborative lawyer confirming the lawyer's representation of a party in the collaborative law process.

(2) Parties may agree to include in a collaborative law participation agreement additional provisions not inconsistent with this chapter.

[ 2013 c 119 s 4.]